Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 41

Tennessee Asbestos Contractor Accreditation and Regulation Act

62-41-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Asbestos Contractor Accreditation and Regulation Act.”

Acts 1993, ch. 285, § 2.

62-41-102. Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish an asbestos contractor accreditation program for this state in compliance with Title II, Section 206 of the federal Toxic Substances Control Act (15 U.S.C.A. § 2646).

Acts 1993, ch. 285, § 1.

62-41-103. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of environment and conservation, in consultation with the commissioner of commerce and insurance, has the authority to promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of establishing an asbestos contractor accreditation program for this state. The commissioner shall prescribe in the rules and regulations any fees to be paid in order for a contractor to be accredited under this program. The rules and regulations shall be approved by the state building commission before they are filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1993, ch. 285, § 3.